Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1801
Conversational Artificial Intelligence Safety Act, how cited.

Sections 86-1801 to 86-1807 shall be known and may be cited as the Conversational Artificial Intelligence Safety Act.

Laws 2026, LB525, § 12.
July 1, 2027